Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0754.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 462. (1) Upon the completion of an audit, including an audit conducted by the auditor general, the principal executive officer of a state agency which that is audited shall, not later than 60 days after the completion of the audit, submit a plan to comply with the audit recommendations to the state budget office. The plan principal executive officer shall be prepared prepare the plan in accordance with procedures prescribed by the state budget director. Copies of the plan shall must be distributed in accordance with the administrative guide to state government. Copies shall must also be distributed to the relevant house and senate appropriations subcommittees, relevant house and senate standing committees, house and senate oversight committees, fiscal agencies, auditor general, and the executive office. (2) The state budget director shall develop procedures for principal departments to follow for the development of corrective action plans. The plan described under this section shall must be prepared in accordance with procedures prescribed by the state budget director and in accordance with reinforcing procedures prescribed by the principal department. (3) Principal departments shall periodically report progress on remediating material weaknesses on a schedule provided by the state budget director. (4) If a principal executive officer fails to comply with this section, the state budget director shall notify the relevant house and senate appropriations subcommittees, relevant house and senate standing committees, house and senate oversight committees, fiscal agencies, auditor general, and executive office of the failure. Sec. 487. (1) Each internal auditor and department management shall report immediately to the department head if the internal auditor or management becomes aware of particularly serious or flagrant problems, abuses, or deficiencies relating to the administration of programs or operations of that principal department or its state agencies. If criminal activity is suspected, the department head shall immediately submit a report to the governor, attorney general, and the auditor general in accordance with the reporting requirements established pursuant to under section 484. Departments shall establish incident reporting protocols, reviewed and approved by the principal department director, to fulfill the reporting of all suspected serious problems by either internal audit or department management. Incidences warranting reporting under these provisions shall include those perpetrated by state employees or external entities with whom departments come into contact. (2) Within Not later than 60 days after the receipt of a department head receives a report filed pursuant to under subsection (1), the department head shall submit a plan to correct the problems, abuses, or deficiencies to the state budget director. Within Not later than 30 days after the receipt of state budget director receives the plan to correct, the state budget director shall submit copies of the plan to correct to the auditor general and the senate and house appropriations committees. If a department head fails to submit a plan as required under this subsection, the state budget director shall notify the relevant house and senate appropriations subcommittees, relevant house and senate standing committees, house and senate oversight committees, fiscal agencies, auditor general, and executive office of the failure. (3) This section shall does not be construed to authorize the public disclosure of information which that is part of an ongoing criminal investigation or which that is specifically prohibited from public disclosure by any other provision of law.